Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF137.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1035XS (1) 91 as/js S.F. 137 Section 1. Section 80B.11D, subsection 3, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 3. An individual who submits an application pursuant to 3 subsection 1 shall, at a minimum, submit proof of successful 4 completion of a two-year or four-year police science or 5 criminal justice program at an accredited educational 6 institution in this state approved by the academy. 7